6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX iG N 43
SFX iG êtir êtir vêtir po:infi
SFX iG êtir êtant vêtir po:ppre
SFX iG êtir êtu vêtir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iG êtir êtus vêtir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iG êtir êtue vêtir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iG êtir êtues vêtir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iG êtir êts vêtir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iG êtir êt vêtir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX iG êtir êtons vêtir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iG êtir êtez vêtir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iG êtir êtent vêtir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iG êtir êtais vêtir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iG êtir êtait vêtir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iG êtir êtions vêtir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iG êtir êtiez vêtir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iG êtir êtaient vêtir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iG êtir êtis vêtir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iG êtir êtit vêtir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iG êtir êtîmes vêtir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iG êtir êtîtes vêtir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iG êtir êtirent vêtir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iG êtir êtirai vêtir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iG êtir êtiras vêtir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iG êtir êtira vêtir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iG êtir êtirons vêtir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iG êtir êtirez vêtir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iG êtir êtiront vêtir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iG êtir êtirais vêtir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iG êtir êtirait vêtir po:cond po:3sg
SFX iG êtir êtirions vêtir po:cond po:1pl
SFX iG êtir êtiriez vêtir po:cond po:2pl
SFX iG êtir êtiraient vêtir po:cond po:3pl
SFX iG êtir ête vêtir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iG êtir êtes vêtir po:spre po:2sg
SFX iG êtir êtisse vêtir po:simp po:1sg
SFX iG êtir êtisses vêtir po:simp po:2sg
SFX iG êtir êtît vêtir po:simp po:3sg
SFX iG êtir êtissions vêtir po:simp po:1pl
SFX iG êtir êtissiez vêtir po:simp po:2pl
SFX iG êtir êtissent vêtir po:simp po:3pl
SFX iG êtir êts vêtir po:impe po:2sg
SFX iG êtir êtons vêtir po:impe po:1pl
SFX iG êtir êtez vêtir po:impe po:2pl
SFX iI N 40
SFX iI ormir ormir dormir po:infi
SFX iI ormir ormant dormir po:ppre
SFX iI ormir ormi dormir po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX iI ormir ors dormir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iI ormir ort dormir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX iI ormir ormons dormir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iI ormir ormez dormir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iI ormir orment dormir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iI ormir ormais dormir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iI ormir ormait dormir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iI ormir ormions dormir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iI ormir ormiez dormir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iI ormir ormaient dormir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iI ormir ormis dormir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iI ormir ormit dormir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iI ormir ormîmes dormir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iI ormir ormîtes dormir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iI ormir ormirent dormir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iI ormir ormirai dormir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iI ormir ormiras dormir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iI ormir ormira dormir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iI ormir ormirons dormir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iI ormir ormirez dormir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iI ormir ormiront dormir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iI ormir ormirais dormir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iI ormir ormirait dormir po:cond po:3sg
SFX iI ormir ormirions dormir po:cond po:1pl
SFX iI ormir ormiriez dormir po:cond po:2pl
SFX iI ormir ormiraient dormir po:cond po:3pl
SFX iI ormir orme dormir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iI ormir ormes dormir po:spre po:2sg
SFX iI ormir ormisse dormir po:simp po:1sg
SFX iI ormir ormisses dormir po:simp po:2sg
SFX iI ormir ormît dormir po:simp po:3sg
SFX iI ormir ormissions dormir po:simp po:1pl
SFX iI ormir ormissiez dormir po:simp po:2pl
SFX iI ormir ormissent dormir po:simp po:3pl
SFX iI ormir ors dormir po:impe po:2sg
SFX iI ormir ormons dormir po:impe po:1pl
SFX iI ormir ormez dormir po:impe po:2pl
SFX iJ Y 43
SFX iJ dormir dormir/n'q'd'l'm't's' dormir po:infi
SFX iJ dormir dormant/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ppre
SFX iJ dormir dormi/L'D'Q' dormir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iJ dormir dormis/D'Q' dormir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iJ dormir dormie/L'D'Q' dormir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iJ dormir dormies/D'Q' dormir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iJ dormir dors/n'q'j'l'm't' dormir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dort/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormons/n'q'l't' dormir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormez/n'q'l'm' dormir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dorment/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dormais/n'q'j'l'm't' dormir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormait/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormions/n'q'l't' dormir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiez/n'q'l'm' dormir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormaient/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dormis/n'q'j'l'm't' dormir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormit/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormîmes/n'q'l't' dormir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormîtes/n'q'l'm' dormir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormirent/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iJ dormir dormirai/n'q'j'l'm't' dormir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iJ dormir dormiras/n'q'l'm't' dormir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormira/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormirons/n'q'l't' dormir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormirez/n'q'l'm' dormir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiront/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iJ dormir dormirais/n'q'j'l'm't' dormir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormirait/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:cond po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormirions/n'q'l't' dormir po:cond po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiriez/n'q'l'm' dormir po:cond po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiraient/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:cond po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dorme/n'q'j'l'm't's' dormir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormes/n'l'm't' dormir po:spre po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormisse/n'q'j'l'm't' dormir po:simp po:1sg
SFX iJ dormir dormisses/n'q'l'm't' dormir po:simp po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormît/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:simp po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormissions/n'q'l't' dormir po:simp po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormissiez/n'q'l'm' dormir po:simp po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormissent/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:simp po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dors/n'l'm't' dormir po:impe po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormons/n'l' dormir po:impe po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormez/n'l'm' dormir po:impe po:2pl
